Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-8,315
Act, how cited.

Sections 81-8,315 to 81-8,319 shall be known and may be cited as the In the Line of Duty Compensation Act.

Laws 2021, LB255, § 1.